Ohio, session 136, HB451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.931 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.931. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound lanes of interstate 8
route number seventy between Brice road and state route two 9
hundred fifty-six in Franklin and Fairfield counties shall be 10
known as the "CPL Lindsey William Mitchell Memorial Highway." 11
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 12
along the highway indicating its name. 13